Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1972.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "public adjuster" in section 1 of the act of December 20, 1983 (P.L.260, No.72), referred to as the Public Adjuster Licensing Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Catastrophic claim settlement." A settlement for a claim 1234567891011121314151617181920 arising from a major disaster as declared by the President of the United States or a disaster emergency proclaimed by the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to general authority of Governor). CATASTROPHIC EVENT. "CATASTROPHIC EVENT." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A MAJOR DISASTER AS DECLARED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES.(2) A DISASTER EMERGENCY PROCLAIMED OR DECLARED BY THE GOVERNOR UNDER 35 PA.C.S. § 7301 (RELATING TO GENERAL AUTHORITY OF GOVERNOR).(3) AN INCIDENT, WHETHER NATURAL OR HUMAN-CAUSED, THAT RESULTS IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) SUBSTANTIAL LOSS OF LIFE OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY AFFECTING A SIGNIFICANT PORTION OF THE POPULATION.(II) WIDESPREAD DESTRUCTION OR DISABLING OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING FACILITIES ESSENTIAL FOR PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, TRANSPORTATION, COMMUNICATION, ENERGY AND THE PROVISION OF FOOD AND WATER.(III) OVERWHELMING DEMAND ON LOCAL, REGIONAL OR NATIONAL EMERGENCY RESPONSE SYSTEMS, SUCH THAT EXISTING RESOURCES ARE INSUFFICIENT TO CONTAIN, MITIGATE OR RECOVER FROM THE INCIDENT WITHOUT EXTERNAL ASSISTANCE.(IV) SEVERE DISRUPTION OF ECONOMIC ACTIVITY, INCLUDING LONG-TERM IMPAIRMENT OF COMMERCE, EMPLOYMENT OR FINANCIAL STABILITY WITHIN THE AFFECTED JURISDICTION.(V) IMPAIRMENT OF GOVERNMENTAL OR PRIVATE SECTOR CAPACITY TO INITIATE, COORDINATE OR SUSTAIN EFFECTIVE RESPONSE AND RECOVERY OPERATIONS.* * *"INSURANCE CLAIM SETTLEMENT." A SETTLEMENT FOR A CLAIM NOT 20250HB1972PN2847 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ARISING FROM A CATASTROPHIC EVENT.* * *"Negotiate." To confer directly with or to offer advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular contract for public adjuster services concerning the substantive benefits, terms or conditions of the contract.* * *"Public adjuster." Any person advertising, soliciting business or holding himself out to the public as an adjuster of claims, excluding claims for personal or commercial auto lines of insurance, for losses or damages arising out of policies of insurance, surety or indemnity upon property, persons or insurable business interests within this Commonwealth, and receiving any compensation or reward for the giving of advice or assistance to the insured in the adjustment of claims for such losses, or who for compensation or reward, whether by way of salary or commission or otherwise, directly or indirectly, solicits business, investigates or adjusts losses or advises the insured with reference to claims for losses on behalf of any other person engaged in the business of adjusting losses. The term does not include an agent or employee of an insurance company, association or an exchange, through whom a policy of insurance was written, in adjusting loss or damage under such policy, nor does it include an insurance producer acting as an adjuster if the services of the insurance producer in the adjustment are without compensation."Relative." A spouse, parent, child, stepparent, stepchild, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half sister, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew or first or second cousin.* * *20250HB1972PN2847 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Sell." To exchange a contract by any means for money or anything of value."SETTLEMENT." THE MONEY PAID OUT BY AN INSURER, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, TO SETTLE A CLAIM, LESS AMOUNTS PAID FOR ADDITIONAL LIVING EXPENSES."Solicit." To attempt to sell, ask or urge a person to obtain public adjuster services.Section 2. Sections 2(a) and (d), 3.1 and 4 of the act are amended to read:Section 2. License.(a) License required.--No person or entity shall represent as or advertise to be a public adjuster, sell, solicit or negotiate a contract for public adjusting services or, directly or indirectly, act within the Commonwealth as a public adjuster without first procuring from the Insurance Commissioner a license as a public adjuster.* * *(d) License not to be issued to certain persons.--No license as a public adjuster shall be issued to any person engaged or interested in, or receiving any profit from, nor shall the holder of any such license engage or be interested in, or receive any profit from, any salvage, repair, replacement, restoration, renovation or demolition of damaged property, real or personal, or similar business.Section 3.1. [Written disclosure] Prohibition of financial interest.(a) Requirement.--A public adjuster [shall provide the insured a written disclosure concerning], or any of the public adjuster's employees, relatives or affiliates, may not have a direct or indirect financial interest [the public adjuster has 20250HB1972PN2847 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with another party involved in an] in any aspect of the claim being adjusted, other than the salary, fee, commission or other consideration established in the written contract with the insured[, including ownership of or compensation expected to be received from a construction firm, building appraisal firm, motor vehicle repair shop or another firm that provides estimates for work or that performs work in conjunction with damages caused by the insured loss on which the public adjuster is engaged].(a.1) Referrals.--The public adjuster, or any of the public adjuster's employees, relatives or affiliates, may not refer or direct an insured to get needed repairs or services in connection with a loss from any person:(1) with whom the public adjuster or any of the public adjuster's employees, relatives or affiliates has a financial interest; or(2) from whom the public adjuster or any of the public adjuster's employees, relatives or affiliates may receive direct or indirect compensation for the referral.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "firm" shall include a corporation, partnership, association, joint-stock company or person. Section 4. Bond.(a) Public adjuster's bond.--Each person receiving a public adjuster's license shall, before issuance and renewal of a license or transacting any business thereunder, execute and deliver to the Insurance Commissioner a bond in the minimum penal sum of [$20,000] $40,000 with such sureties as the Insurance Commissioner may approve[.] and shall provide proof of the bond to the Insurance Commissioner.20250HB1972PN2847 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a.1) Termination or replacement of public adjuster bond.--The issuer of a bond issued to a public adjuster shall not terminate or replace the bond unless written notice is filed with the Insurance Commissioner and given to the licensee no less than 30 days prior to the termination or replacement of the bond.(b) (Reserved).(c) Condition of bond.--The bond of the public adjuster shall be conditioned that said public adjuster will faithfully comply with all the requirements of this act and shall not embezzle, take, secrete or otherwise dispose of or fraudulently withhold, appropriate, lend, invest or otherwise use or apply any money or substitutes for money or any salvage, goods or property received by him as such public adjuster or employee of a public adjuster[, contrary to the instructions or without the consent of the assured or his legal representative]. Any person, firm or corporation who has entered into a contract with a public adjuster, as provided in section 5, and who shall suffer loss by reason of the failure of the public adjuster to comply with this act and faithfully perform his duties shall have the right to intervene and be made a party to any action instituted by the Commonwealth on the bond of the public adjuster and to have his, her or its rights and claims adjudicated in such action and judgment rendered thereon, subject, however, to the priority of the claim and judgment of the Commonwealth. If the amount of the liability of the surety on said bond is sufficient to pay the full amount due the Commonwealth, the remainder shall be distributed pro rata among said intervenors. If no suit should be brought by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, upon application therefore and furnishing affidavit to the department 20250HB1972PN2847 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that loss has been suffered by reason of failure of the public adjuster to comply with this act or faithfully perform his duties, such insured shall be furnished with a certified copy of said bond, upon which he, she or it shall have a right of action, and shall be and are hereby authorized to bring suit in the name of the Commonwealth for his, her or its use and benefit against said public adjuster and his sureties and to prosecute the same to final judgment and execution. [Where suit is instituted by any such insureds on the bond of the public adjuster, it shall be commenced within one year after the performance and final settlement of said contract, and not later. Where suit is so instituted by an insured or insureds, no other action shall be brought by any other claimant, but any other claimant may file his claim in the action first brought and be made party thereto within one year from the completion of the work under said contract, and not later. If two or more actions be brought on the same day, the action in which the largest claim is demanded shall be regarded as the first action. Any creditor who has brought an action within one year as aforesaid, but after suit brought by another creditor or on the same day, may intervene in the suit first brought within the year, notwithstanding the fact that the intervention in such case be after the expiration of the year, provided said intervention be made within 30 days after the expiration of the year.] If the recovery on the bond should be inadequate to pay the amounts found due to all of said creditors, judgment shall be given to each creditor pro rata of the amount of the recovery. The surety on said bond may pay into the court, for distribution among said claimants and creditors, the full amount of the surety's liability, to wit, the penalty named in the 20250HB1972PN2847 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bond, less any amount which said surety may have had to pay to the Commonwealth by reason of the execution of said bond, and, upon so doing, the surety will be relieved from further liability. In all suits instituted under the provisions of this act, such personal notice of the pendency of such suits, informing them of their right to intervene, as the court may order, shall be given to all known creditors and, in addition thereto, notice shall be given by publication in newspapers of general circulation, published in the county or municipality where the contract was performed, once a week for at least three successive weeks: Provided, however, That, when such suit has begun within three weeks of the end of the year within which suit may be brought, said notice by publication shall be only for the period intervening between the time of instituting such suit and the end of the year.Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 4.1. Fees.(a) Limits.--A public adjuster may not charge, agree to or accept as compensation or reimbursement any payment, commission, fee or another thing of value that is more than:(1) for a catastrophic claim settlement, 10%; or(2) for an insurance claim settlement, 15% 18% . (b) Prohibition.--A public adjuster may not:(1) require, demand or accept any fee, retainer, compensation, deposit or other thing of value prior to settlement of a claim; or(2) collect a fee from the portion of a claim CATASTROPHIC CLAIM SETTLEMENT OR AN INSURANCE CLAIM SETTLEMENT offered to or received by the insured before the public adjuster was retained.20250HB1972PN2847 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4.2. Requirements and prohibitions.(a) Notification letter.--A public adjuster shall provide the insurer a notification letter, which must be signed by the insured, authorizing the public adjuster to represent the insured's interest. The insurer shall verify that the person acting as the public adjuster holds a valid license with the department. If the person acting as the public adjuster does not hold a valid license, the insurer:(1) Shall notify the department, who may refer the matter to the Office of Attorney General for investigation of a violation of any of the following:(i) The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(ii) The act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act.(iii) Section 6(b.1).(2) May not issue payment to the person acting as an adjuster associated with the claim.(b) Assignment.--(1) Subject to a policy's terms relating to assignability, a property insurance policy, regardless of when issued, may provide that the rights and benefits under the insurance policy may only be assigned to a person who has the legal authority to represent the named insured or to a subsequent owner of the property to whom title is transferred, and may prohibit assignment of rights and benefits to any other person, including a property repair contractor.(2) For the purposes of this subsection, having "legal 20250HB1972PN2847 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority to represent the named insured" includes the person named by the named insured as having the named insured's power of attorney, the person who is the named insured's licensed public adjuster or any other comparable person. Property repair contractors operating in this Commonwealth may not subvert the public adjuster licensing requirements of the act through the acquisition of a power of attorney from the named insured.(c) Prohibitions.--A public adjuster may not:(1) Suggest that the property is damaged unless an inspection of the property has been completed.(2) Offer to pay an insured's deductible or indicate that the insured's deductible will be waived.(3) Acquire any interest in the salvage of property subject to a contract with the insured.(4) Withhold funds due to an insured in excess of the amount of the fee due to the public adjuster for more than 30 d ays subject to section 5(e)(4). (5) Restrict or prevent an insurer or other person acting on behalf of the insurer from:(i) Accessing the insured property that is the subject of the claim.(I) HAVING ACCESS TO THE INSURED PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE CLAIM WITH REASONABLE NOTICE TO THE PUBLIC ADJUSTER OR INSURED.(ii) Obtaining information necessary to investigate and process a claim.(iii) Contacting the insured directly regarding the claim, except the insurer shall send to the public adjuster a copy of any correspondence with the insured 20250HB1972PN2847 - 10 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relating to the claim.(d) Inquiry or request for information.--For a written inquiry by the department or a request for documentation related to an application or renewal of a license or an investigation, a public adjuster must provide a written response or produce the requested documents within 30 days of receiving the inquiry or request.(e) Cooperation with investigation.--A public adjuster shall cooperate with the department in any investigation related to a violation of this act. Cooperation includes, but is not limited to, being interviewed by the department, providing a written statement to the department, providing pertinent documentation, testifying at a proceeding and completing an authorization for release of information, as necessary, in a form specified by the department.(f) Failure to respond.--If a public adjuster fails to respond to an inquiry as specified in subsection (d) and fails to correct the violation within 15 days, the department may file an order to show cause against the public adjuster on that basis and seek a fine of no more than $100 per day in addition to the denial, suspension or revocation of a license.(g) Required reporting of denial, suspension or revocation of license.--A public adjuster must report having a public adjuster license or other professional license, or an equivalent, denied, suspended or revoked by a governmental entity or self-regulating professional association to the department within 30 days of the occurrence.(h) Required reporting of criminal charge.--Within 30 days of being charged with criminal conduct, a public adjuster shall report the charges to the department. The public adjuster shall 20250HB1972PN2847 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide the department with the following within 30 days of availability to the public adjuster:(1) A copy of the criminal complaint, information or indictment.(2) A copy of the order resulting from a pretrial hearing, if any.(3) A report of the final disposition of the charges.Section 4.3. Separate pre-contract disclosure.Prior to the signing of a contract, a public adjuster shall provide the insured with a separate disclosure document regarding the claim process, which must contain the following information:(1) That a property insurance policy obligates the insured to present a claim to the insurance company for consideration.(2) An explanation of the three types of adjusters that could be involved in the claim consideration process under paragraph (1), as follows:(i) A company adjuster who is an insurance adjuster who is an employee of an insurance company. A company adjuster represents the interest of the insurance company and is paid by the insurance company. A company adjuster will not charge the insured a fee.(ii) An independent adjuster who is the insurance adjuster hired on a contract basis by an insurance company to represent the insurance company's interest in the settlement of the claim. An independent adjuster is paid by the insured's insurance company. An independent adjuster will not charge the insured a fee.(iii) A public adjuster who is an insurance adjuster 20250HB1972PN2847 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who does not work for an insurance company. A public adjuster works for the insured to assist in the preparation, presentation and settlement of the claim. The insured hires a public adjuster by signing a contract agreeing to pay the public adjuster a fee or commission based on a percentage of the settlement or other method of compensation.(3) That the insured may, but is not required to, hire a public adjuster to help the insured meet the obligations under the policy.(4) That the insured may initiate direct communications with an attorney retained by the insured, the insurer, the insurer's adjuster, the insurer's attorney or any other person regarding the settlement of the insured's claim.(5) That the public adjuster is not a representative or employee of the insurer.(6) That the salary, fee, commission or other consideration paid to a public adjuster is the obligation of the insured.(7) The public adjuster's license number and the web address of or a link to the department's publicly accessible Internet website to verify current licensure.(8) A statement that the individual may file a complaint with the department that contains the web address of or a link to the department's current publicly accessible Internet website, email and telephone number.Section 4. Sections 5(a), (a.1), (a.2) and (d) and 6(a) introductory paragraph and (7) of the act are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 5. Contract.20250HB1972PN2847 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Written contract required.--No public adjuster shall, directly or indirectly, act within this Commonwealth as a public adjuster without having first entered into a contract, in writing, on a form approved by the department prior to the issuance of the public adjuster's license and executed in duplicate by the public adjuster and the insured or a duly authorized representative. One copy of this contract shall be kept on file by the public adjuster, available at all times for inspection by the department. The department shall disapprove a contract form if, in the department's opinion, the contract or its provisions:(1) Fail to comply with this section or any regulation.(2) Are unreasonable.(3) Are contrary to the interests of the public.(4) Are misleading or unfair to the insured.At the department's discretion, the department may also require the submission of advertising or solicitation material.(a.1) Rescission.--(1) A contract with a public adjuster may be rescinded by any person signing the contract[.] within:(i) five business days after signature for all contracts; or(ii) 15 business days if the contract was signed within five business days after the loss was discovered by the insured.(I) TEN BUSINESS DAYS FOR CONTRACTS INVOLVING A CATASTROPHIC CLAIM.(II) FIVE BUSINESS DAYS FOR CONTRACTS INVOLVING AN INSURANCE CLAIM THAT ARE SIGNED WITHIN 48 HOURS OF A LOSS AS A RESULT OF DIRECT SOLICITATION BY A PUBLIC ADJUSTER. 20250HB1972PN2847 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AS USED IN THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE TERM "DIRECT SOLICITATION" MEANS A LIVE, PERSON-TO-PERSON CONTACT FROM A PUBLIC ADJUSTER TO AN INSURED, WHICH OCCURS AT THE SCENE OF A LOSS WITHIN 48 HOURS OF A LOSS-PRODUCING EVENT, WHEN PECUNIARY GAIN IS A SIGNIFICANT MOTIVE FOR THE CONTACT.(III) THREE BUSINESS DAYS FOR ALL OTHER CONTRACTS INVOLVING AN INSURANCE CLAIM.(2) If the insured exercises the right to rescind the contract, anything of value given by the insured under the contract shall be returned to the insured within 15 business days following the receipt by the public adjuster of the rescission notice.(3) If an insured exercises the insured's right to rescind under this subsection, the insured shall be liable for:(i) the reasonable value of services performed by the public adjuster; and(ii) the reasonable and necessary emergency out-of-pocket expenses or services that were paid for or incurred by the public adjuster during the period preceding rescission.(a.2) Disclosure.--The contracts shall disclose the following items with each of these items separately signed or initialed by the insured and the public adjuster:(1) That the insured has the right to rescind the contract [within three calendar days after signature] pursuant to subsection (a.1).(2) Fees to be charged or assessed by the public adjuster together with an explanation about how the fees will 20250HB1972PN2847 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 come from a portion of the claims payment, if any, made by the insurer under the policy and are not in addition to the payments.(3) That the adjuster will provide the insured a copy of an estimate or report of losses and, upon the insured's request, any supporting documentation it sends to the insurer.(4) That the public adjuster is not a representative or employee of the insurer and is an independent licensee of the department.(5) The public adjuster's license number and the web address of or a link to the department's publicly accessible Internet website to verify current licensure.(6) A description and location of the loss, if applicable.(7) A description of services to be provided to the insured.(8) Attestation language stating that the public adjuster is fully bonded under the laws of this Commonwealth.(9) A statement that the individual may file a complaint with the department, which shall contain the department's current publicly accessible Internet website, email and telephone number.(10) A STATEMENT AFFIRMING THAT THE PUBLIC ADJUSTER OR ANY OF THE PUBLIC ADJUSTER'S EMPLOYEES, RELATIVES OR AFFILIATES DO NOT HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT FINANCIAL INTEREST IN ANY ASPECT OF THE CLAIM BEING ADJUSTED, OTHER THAN THE SALARY, FEE, COMMISSION OR OTHER CONSIDERATION ESTABLISHED IN THE CONTRACT BETWEEN THE PUBLIC ADJUSTER AND INSURED.20250HB1972PN2847 - 16 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(a.4) Co-payee.--A contract may specify that a public adjuster shall be named as a co-payee on an insurer's payment of a claim only if the following requirements are met:(1) The public adjuster's compensation is based on a share of the insurance settlement, the exact percentage of which must be specified.(2) Initial expenses to be reimbursed to the public adjuster from the proceeds of the claim payment are specified by type, with dollar estimates specified in the contract and with any additional expenses first approved by the insured.(3) Compensation provisions in a public adjusting contract may not be redacted in any copy of the contract provided to the Insurance Commissioner.(a.5) Responsibilities of public adjuster.--If an insurer, not later than five business days after the date on which a loss is reported to the insurer, either pays or commits in writing to pay to the insured the policy limit of the insurance policy, the public adjuster:(1) May not receive a commission consisting of a percentage of the total amount paid by an insurer to resolve a claim.(2) Shall inform the insured that the loss recovery amount might not be increased by the insurer.(3) Shall be entitled only to reasonable compensation, as determined by the Insurance Commissioner, for services provided by the public adjuster based on the time spent on a claim and expenses incurred by the public adjuster during the five business days.* * *20250HB1972PN2847 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Contracts limited to adjustment of insurance losses.--No public adjuster shall, directly or indirectly, through or with any person, partnership, corporation or association in which it has an indirect or beneficial interest, enter into any contract with any insured for the repair, replacement, restoration, renovation or demolition of damaged property, real or personal, [at any time prior to the date a verdict or award is entered or payment is received from the insurance carrier, whichever event shall occur first.] that the public adjuster has been contracted to adjust.(e) Public adjuster contract contents.--A public adjuster contract may not contain any contract term that:(1) allows the public adjuster's percentage fee to be collected when money is due from an insurance company but not paid or that allows a public adjuster to collect the entire fee from the first check issued by an insurance company rather than as percentage of each check issued by an insurance company;(2) requires the insured to authorize an insurance company to issue a check only in the name of the public adjuster;(3) imposes collection costs or late fees; or(4) permits the public adjuster to:(i) charge a fee for the negotiation of additional living expenses; or(ii) withhold a fee from payment of additional living expenses.Section 6. Revocation, etc., of license.(a) Grounds for fines, suspensions or revocations.--[Committing any of the following acts] The following acts are 20250HB1972PN2847 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibited and shall be grounds for fine, suspension or revocation of a public adjuster's license:* * *(7) Receiving, directly or indirectly, any compensation, referral fee, commission or thing of value or profit from any person, partnership, association or corporation engaged or interested in the business of salvage, repair, replacement, restoration, renovation or demolition of damaged property, real or personal[, unless such compensation, commission or thing of value or profit is disclosed to the insured and agreed to in the contract].* * *(b.1) Additional penalty.--In addition to a penalty provided under this act, unlicensed activity prohibited under this act THE FOLLOWING shall constitute an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4117 (relating to insurance fraud) and shall subject a person or entity to criminal prosecution as a felony of the third degree and to civil penalties. PENALTIES: (1) UNLICENSED ACTIVITY PROHIBITED UNDER THIS ACT.(2) A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3.1.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1972PN2847 - 19 - <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122